Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB175.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 177 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Any signage placed on state-maintained highways at the border of another state
indicating to motorists that they are entering Kentucky shall not include the names of
the Governor or Lieutenant Governor.
Section 2. Within 30 days of the effective date of this Act, the Transportation
Cabinet shall ensure existing signage on state-maintained highways conforms with the
provisions of Section 1 of this Act.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/6/2025 11:52 AM Jacketed